rootfs.img.gz/fwo_rootfs.img/usr/java/lib/dictionaries/hyphen/hyph_ru.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.аб1р
.а1б
.аг1ро
.а1г
.а1ди2
.а1д
.а1и2
.ак1р
.а1к
.а3ль3я
.аль1
.ар2т1о2
.а2р1т
.ас1то
.аст1р
.а1у2
.би2о
.б2и
.во2б3л
.во1б2
.во3ж2д
.во1ж
.го2ф
.дек2
.де1кв
.ди2а1к
.ди1а
.ди1о
.до3п2
.до3т2
.епи3
.е1п
.зав2р
.за1
.за3м2н
.за1м
.за3п2
.иг1р
.и1г
.и2з1г2
.из3н
.и1и2
.ик1р
.и1к
.ио2
.ио4на
.и1он
.ис3
.л2е2о
.ле2п3р
.ле1п
.ле2с1к
.ль2
.люст1
.л2ю
.ме2ж1у2
.ме1ж
.ми1о1м
.мо2к1
.му2шт1
.му1ш
.на1в
.на3т
.на3ш2
.не8
.не3в1н
.не1др
.не1з2
.н2е1сл
.не1с2ц
.не3т
.нос1к
.нук1л
.обо3ж2
.о1бо
.ово1
.о1в
.ог3н
.о1г2
.оз4
.ос2ка
.ос2п2
.ос3пи
.от1в2
.о1т
.от1ро
.от1ру
.от1у1ж
.по3в2
.по3ж2
.по1з2н
.прос2
.ра2с3т
.ре2бр
.р2еб
.ре2з3в
.ри2с1к
.ри1с2
.ри2ч
.ро2з3в
.ро2с3л
.ро2х
.се4п1т2
.с2е
.се1п
.ск2
.ст2
.су2ж
.т2е2о3
.т2е
.ти1а3
.ти2г
.тиг1р
.ти2о
.уб2
.уд2
.у1е2
.уз2на
.уз1н
.ук2
.у2м2ч
.у1м
.у1о3
.у1п2
.ур2в
.ус2
.ут2р
.у1ю2
.хо2р3в
.че2с1к
.юс1
4а3а
аа2п
аа2р
аа2ц
а1б
абе3с1т
а1бе
а3бла
аб1л
аб2л2ю
аб1ри
а3б2у
ав1в
а1ве
ав3зо
а1в2з2
а1ви
ави2а
а1во
аво1с
а2во1т
ав1ра
а3в2с2е3
а2в1с2
а2в1т2
а1ву
а2вх
а3в2че
а2в1ч
2аг2а
а1г
ага1с2
а2гд
а2гити
аг2и
аги1т
а2г1ле
аг2ли
а2глос
аг1ло
аг2ло1т
2аго
а3гу
а1д
2адв2
а2д1ве
ад2жи
ад1ж
ади2од
а1ди
а2д1л
а2д1о2б1л
а1до
ад1ро
а2д1ру
аду3ч
а1ду
ад2ц
а2дын
а1ды1
а1е
ае2го
ае1г
ае2ди
ае2л
а2е1п
ае2ре
ае2с
аза4ш3
а1за1
азв2
аз3вез
аз1ве
аз1в1л
а2з1г2
аз1др
аз1об
аз2о1б1р
а2зовь1
а1зо1в
а2золь1
а1зол2
а1зо1ри
аз2о1с2
аз1р
а1и
аи2г1
а2и3гл
а2их
а1к
ак1в
1а2к1к2
ак2л
а2к3ле1м
ако1б2
ак2о
2а3ко2н1с2
ако3т
2акри
а2к1с
а1ла
а3ла1г
а1ле
2алек
а3ли
ало1з
а1ло
а1лу
алу2ш
алуш1т
а1лы1
а2ль1щ
аль1
а1л2ю
2ама
а1м
а4м1б4
2амет
а2ми2н1т
ам2нет
а2м1н
ам1не
2амо
амо1з2
амо3и2
а2мч
ана2д2ц
а1на
ана1д
а2н1а2ме
ана1м
а2на1ф
ан2дра
а2н1д
а2н1о2б2
а1но
ан1о2хр
ан1р
ан2с1п2
а2н1с
ан1с1у
ан2су2р
а2н1уз
а1ну
а1нь1
2а1о
ао2д
ао2к
ао2р
ао2с
ао1ст1
а3пла
а1п
ап2ло1м
ап1ло
2апо
апо4в2с2
апо1в
апо3ч2т
ап2ра
ап1ре1л
а1ра
ара2с1т
ар2бо1к
а2р1б
ар1бо
ар2вал
ар1ва
1аргу
а2р1г
а1ре
аре1дв2
аре1ол
ар2ео
ар2жа
ар1ж
а1ри
а1ро
ар2тор
а2р1т
ар2т1р
а1ру
а2р1х
а1ры1
а1р2ю
а1ря
2ас1к
ас3ми
ас2м
а2с3но
ас1н
1асси1г
а2с1с
а4с5с2и
ас2т1ву
ас3те1м
ас2т2е
ас2тин
а1сти
ас2ти1я
ас1то1о2
ас1тух
а1с3ть2е
ас4ть1
ас2шед
ас1ш2
ас2ше1с2
а1сь2и1
ась1
а1та
1ата1к
а2т3ва
а2т1ви
а2т1ву
2атез
а1т2е
а1ти
а1то
ат1о1бе
а2то2м1н
ато1м
ато2ш
ат1рах
ат1ри
а1ту
а2т2х
а1ты1
а3ть2е
а2ть1
а3ть2ю1
а3ть2я
а1т2ю
а1тя
а1у
а2уб
ау2д
ау3до
а2у1ле
аут1р
ау2х
ау2ч
ау3чь1
а2у1э1
а2ф1л
а1ф
а1х2а
ахми2
ах1м
а2х3с2
а1ч
2а1ча
а2чл
ач1т
а2шл
а1ш
аэ2ли
а1э
а2эр
аю1та
а1ю
а1я
ая2б
ая2в
ая2з
1ба
ба2б1в
ба1б
ба2г1р
ба1г
ба2др
ба1д
ба1з
ба3зу
ба1л2ю1
б2а2о
бас3м
ба1ст
ба1тр
2б1б
б1в
б1вы2
б1г2
2б1д
1бе
3бев
бе2гл
бе1г
бе2гн
бе2д1р
3бе1е
3бе2з
бе1з1а2
без5д4
бе3зи
без3н
без1о2
без1р
бе2с1к
б2ес3п2
бе2с1т
бес3т2е
бе1с3ти
3бе1ц
2бе1щ
2б1ж
б1з2
1б2и
3би1а
б2и2б
2би1ж
3би1к
били3т2
би1л
би1ли
3био
би2об
би2од
би2он
би2ор
би2тв
би1т
би1х
2б3к
б1л
1бла1г
1б2лаз
б3ла1зи
б2лан
1б2ле1е
б3лен
б2ле2с1к
1б2ле1я
б2луд
1б2лу1ж
2блы1
2б2ль1
2б3лю.
бл2ю
б2люд
б2лю1е
б2люл
2б3люсь1
2б1ля
2б3н
1бо
бо1бра
боб1р
бо3в1ш
бо1в
бо2гд
бо1г2
бо1дра
бо1з2
бо1л2ж
бо1льс
боль1
бо3м2л
бо1м
бо2м2ч
бо3м1ш2
бо1ну1
бо1ру
бо2са
бо1ск
бо3ск2о
бо3сти
бо1ст
3бо1т
бо2тв2
бот2р
боя2р
бо1я
2бр.
б3ра1б
б2рав
бра1зо
1б2рал
2б1ра1м
б2ран
1брас
б2ра2ть1
б1рах
1б2ра1ч
2б3ра1я
1б2ред
б1ре2й1
б1рек
б2ре1м
б2рех
б2рид
б2рито
бри1т
б2риты1
1б2ро1ди
б1рол
б1ром.
бро1м
1б2ро1с2и
бро2с1к
2б4р1с
б1ру
3б2ру2кс
2брь1
1б2р2ю
2б3рю.
б1ря
2б1с2
б3ск
бс4л
б1т
1б2у
бу2г1р
бу1г
бук1л
бу1с
2б1ф
2б1х
2б1ц
2б1ч
2б1ш
2б1щ
1бы1
бы2г1
бы2с
быс1к
быст1
1бь1
2бь.
2бьс
2бьт
бэ1р
б1э
3б2ю
бю1та
1бя
1ва
ва2бр
ва1б
3ва1г
ва2д1р
ва1д
вадь2
ва3ж2д
ва1ж
ва1з
ва2н1с2
ва1ст
ва2стр
ва1тр
вах1
3ва1ц
3ва1я
2в1б
в1ви
в1вр
2в1г2
в1д
в2дох
в1до
1вев
3ве1г
вед1р
ве3ду
1ве1е
1вез
3ве3зе
3вез1л
ве1з2у
1вей.
ве2й1
ве2п1
2ве2р1д
1вес
ве2с1к
ве2ст1в
ве1ст
вет3р
1ве1ц
1ве1ю
1ве1я
1в2з2
в2з1г2
взд2
взо1б
взъ2
взъе3д
ви2аз
ви1а
ви2а1к
ви2ар
ви2а1с2
виа1т
ви3а1ф
ви2гв
ви1г
в2и2гл
1виз
1ви2н1т
1ви2н1ч
ви1о
ви1с2ни
вис1н
ви1у3
ви2ф
2в1к
вк2л
3в2кус
вк2у
в1л
в2ла
2в3ла1б
в2лев
в2лек
в2лет
в2леч
2в1ли
в2ли1я
2вл2ю
в2лю1б
2в1ля
2в1м
1вме
2в1н
4в3на
в2нес
в1не
в1но1
в3ну.
в1ну
3в2нук
3в2нуч
в3ны1
во1б2
во2б3ла
воб1л
во1в2
во3в1к
1вод
во1дв2
во1др
во2ер
во1е
во2ж1ж
во1ж
вои2с1
во3и
1во1к
во3м2
во1п2
во1ру
2в2о2р1ц
2ворь1
вос1к
во1с2м
во1с1н
вос3пе1
вос1п2
во2стр
во1ст
вот2р
во1т
1вох
во1хл
во3х2т
1в2о1ю
2в1п2
2вр.
2в1ра.
в2рав
2в1ра1м
в1рас
2в1рах
2вра1ц
2в1ре.
2в1рен
1врид
1в2риз
в1ри1и
в1ри1к
в1ри1л
в1ри1с2
в1ри1т
2в1ро
вро3т2
2в1ры1
1вр2ю
в1ря
2в1с2
3в1с2е3
в3ска1я
4в3ски
4в3ск2у
3в2с1п2
3в2с2ю
в1т2
вто1б2
вто3ш
1ву1а
ву3г
1ву1з
2ву1и
2ву1к
ву3п
ву1с2
ву2х1а
ву2х3в
ву1чл
в1ф2
1в1хо
2в1ц
2в1ч
2в1ш
3в2шив
2в1щ
въ2
1вы1
вы3г2
вы3з1н
вы1п2
вы3т2
вых2
вы3ш2л
вы1ш
2вь.
вь1
1вь2е
1вьин
вь2и1
2вьс
2вьт
1вь2ю
1вь2я
1в2э1
1в2ю
1вя
1г
г2а
га1з
га1ст2
га2у
2г3б
г1ба2
г1ви
2г1г
г3дан
г1да
2г3ди
3ге.
г2е2б1
ге1но1
ге2о2б
г2ео
ге2од
ге1ор
2г3ж
2г1з
г2и
ги2б1л
г2и1б
ги3б1р
ги2гр
ги1г
ги1сл
ги1ст2
2г1к
2г1ла.
г2лав
г1ла2й1
г1лами
гла1м
2глась1
2г1ла1я
г1ле
г2лет
2гли.
г1ли
г2лин
3г2ли1ф
2гло.
г1ло
г3ло2б1л
2гло1в
2гло1г2
2гло1е
2гл2о2й1
2гл2о1ю
2г1лу1ю
2г1лы1
г2ля1ж
г1ля
2гля1к
2г3м
г2нав
г1на
г2нан
г8не.
г1не
г2нев
г3нен
г3не3п2
г3нес
г2ни1р
г1ни
гни2т2р
гни1т
г2но1е
г1но
г2но3и
г2нос
г3ня
го1б2
го2в1л
го1в
го3ж2д
го1ж
го1з
го2з1л
гоз2н
1гои2г2
го3и
3г2о2й1
г2ол
гоми2
го1м
го2с1а
го2сд2
го1ск2л
го1с1н
го1спа
гос1п2
2г1о2т1д
го1т
гоу3т
го1у2
го1ч2л
3г2о1ю
2г1п
2гр.
г1ра1е
г1ра2й1
г1рар
1г1ре1г
г1рек
г1ре1ц
гри4в3н
г1ри1к
г1ри1л
г1р2ин
г1ри1с2
г1ри1ч
г1ро1в
г2роз
г1ро1к
г1рон
г1ро1п
г1ро1т
г1ро1ф
гру2п
г1рыв
гры1
2гр2ю
г1ря1е
г1ря1л
г1рят
2г3с2
г4са
г4сб2
2г3т
гу1в
гу1с
гу2с1к
2г1ф
2г1ч
2г3ш
2г3э
1да
да2б1
да2ген
да1г
да2гр
да1з
д2а2о
даст1р
дат1р
2д1б
дв2
д1ве
1дви
2д1вид
2д1виз
2д1ви2н1т
2д1ви2н1ч
2д1вис
2д1ви1т
д3в1к
д1в1л
2д1вод
д1воз
1д2ворь1
2д1вя
2д1г2
2д1д2
1де
де1б2л
д2еб
де1б2р
3девр
3дез
де2з1а2
де2зи
дез1о2
де2зу
деи2о2
де1и
де1кл
3деме
де1м
де2од
д2ео
део3п2
де3пл
де1п
дерас2
де1ра
де2с3в
де1с2к
де2ср
де1хл
2дж.
д1ж
д2жа1м
д2ж3м
2д2ж1с
2д1з2
1ди
ди2а1д
ди1а
диа2з
ди2а3ли
ди2а1ло
ди2ар
ди2ас
ди2об
дио3де
ди1од
ди2ор
дио1с
ди1о3ти
дио1т
д2и1п2
ди2пи
ди3п1т
ди2с1тр
ди1ст
ди1у3
ди3фр
ди1ф
ди3фто
ди2ф1т
ди1х
2д1к
д1л
д2лев
2д3м2
2д1н
д3на
дне1а2
д1не
3д2не2в1н
4д3но1
дно3д2
днос2
4д3ны1
3д2ня1ш
д1ня
1до
2д1о2бед
до1бе
до2б1л
2д1обла
до1б2ра
доб1р
дов2л
до1в
до3в2м
до1д2
до3д1н
до3ж2д
до1ж
до1з
доз2н
дои2р
до3и
2д1о2к1т
до1к
2доли1м
до1ли
до2м1р
до1м
до1п2
до3пл
2допле
до2пре
до2руб
до1с
д1о2сен
до1с2е
д1о2син
до1с2и
2д1о2с1но
дос1н
дос2п2
2д1о2т1д
до1т
2до2т1л
дот2ри
2д1отря
2до2тъ1
до3ть1
3дохл
до2ш3в
до1ш
до3ш2к2
до2ш1лы1
до2щу
до1щ
2д1п
2др.
д1ра1б
1дра2в1ш
2дразв2
1д2раз1н
д1ра1не
д1рар
д1ра2с3
д1рах
д1ра1ч
д2ра1ю
д1ре
д2р2еб
2д3ре1ж
2дрез
д2рел
д2ре1м
1дрема
1дре2м1л
дре2м3н
1дремы1
2д3рен
дре2ск
д2ре2с1с
д1ри
д2ри2й1
2др2ин
д2р2и1п
д2рих
дро2г3н
дро1г2
д1род
д1ро1е
1д2ро1ж
2д3роз
д1р2о2й1
д1рол
д1рон
д1рос
д1ро1т
д1р2о1ю
д1руб
1дру1г
1дру1ж
д1ру1м
д1ру1ю
д1ры1
2дрыв
1д2ры1г
д1ря
д2ряб
1д2ря1г
д2рях
2д1с2
дск2
д2с3к1н
2д1т
1ду
дуб3р
ду3г
2д1уд
ду2да
ду2о
ду2п1л
ду1п
дус1к
д1ус2л
ду1ст
ду2ста
2дут1р
ду1х
ду2чи
дуэ1т
д2у1э
2д1ф
д1х
2д3це
д1ц
2д3цу
2д3цы1
2д1ч
2д3ш2
2д1щ
2дъ1
дъе2м
1ды1
2ды1г
ды2г1р
2дыд
2дыме
ды1м
2ды2с1
2дыт
2ды1щ
2дь.
дь1
1дь2е
2дьк
2дьт
1дь2ю
1дь2я
дь3яр
1д2ю
1дя
е1а
еа2д
еа1ди3
еа3до
еа2з
еан2д1р
еа2н1д
еат1р
2еб
еба2с
е1ба
е1бра
еб1рен
еб1ри
е1бро
еб1ро1в
еб1ры1
е2б3р2ю
е1ве
2евер
е1ви
е3в2ме
е2в1м
ев2ни1м
е2в1н
ев1ни
ев2нят
ев1ня
е1во
2евол
ев1ра1с
2е1вре
ев1ре1е
ев1ре2й1
ев1ре1я
ев1ри
е2в1т2
е1ву
е1вх
е1в2хо
е1вь1
ега1с2
е1г
ег2а
ег2д
е2глан
е2г1ле
е2г1ли
е2г1ло
ег2на
ег2но
2ег2р
ед1во
едв2
ед2ж
е1дже
е1д2лин
ед1л
ед1ли
едно1у3
е2д1н
е4д3но1
ед1опр
е1до
едо1п2
е2дотв2
едо1т
е2дох
е2д1о1щ
е1дру
е2д1ру.
е2ду2б
е1ду
ед1у1бо
е2дуве
е2ду3г
е2дус
ед1у1ст
2е3ду1ш
е2дын
е1ды1
е1е
е2евид
ее1ви
ее2в1р
ее2г2и
ее1г
ее1с2
ее2ст
еест1р
ее2х
е2ж1г2
е1ж
е4ждев
е2ж1д
еж1де
еж3ди
2еже
е2ж1р
еза2вр
е1за1
еза1у3
е1з2ва
езд1р
е3зе
ез1зу3
ез3з2
е3зи1т
е1зи
ез1об
ез1о2г2
е1зо3м2
ез1о1п
ез1о2р
ез1о1т
ез1о1ш2
ез2ря
ез1у2д
е1зу
е2з1у2к
е2з1у1п
ез1ус
езу2со
езу2сы1
ез1у2х
ез1у1ча
е3зя
е1и
еи2г1
еи2д
еи2м
еи2о
еис1л
еис1тр
еи1ст
е1ка
ека2б
е2к2з
е1ки
2е1к2о
2е1кр
ек2ро
ек1ск
е2кс
ек1с3т2е
е1к2у
е1ла
е1ле
еле3ск
еле1с1ц
е1лу
е1лы1
е1л2ю
е3ля
еми3д2
е1м
еми3к
емо1с
2ему1ж
е2мч
2емы2с
емы1
е3на
ен2д1р
е2н1д
2е1нр
е2н1с2
е2н3ш2
е1н2э
2ео
е1о2б
еоб2ро
еоб1р
е2о3гл
ео1г2
ео2гро
е1од
ео3да
ео2де
ео3де3з
ео2до
е1о2ж
е2о3и
е2о3к2л
ео1к
е1ол.
е1о3ла
ео3ли
е1о2л1к
е1о1лы1
е1оль1
е2о1м
е1он.
е2о3на
е2о1ни
ео3но
е1о2н1с2
ео1п2
е1опе1
ео2пр
ео4пу
е2о3ро
еос2
е1о2сви
ео1с2в
ео1ск
е1ос2м
е1ос1н
еост1р
ео1ст
е2о3с1х2
е1о2т1л
ео1т
еот2ру
е1о2ч
е1о2щ
епат2
е1п
епа1тр
2епе1
епис2к
е2пл
е3пла
еп1ле1ш
е3п2лод
еп1ло
еп1лу
е3плы1
еп1лю1щ
епл2ю
е4п1н
2епо
е4п3с2
е4п1т
е1ра
ер1а2к1т
ера1к
е2рв
ер1ве
е1ре
е3ре.
ере3до
ере1др
ере1к2
ере3м2н
ере1м
ере3п
ере1х4
е1ри
ери1о3з
е1ро
еро2б
ер1об1л
2ерови
еро1в
2е1рокр
еро1к
2ерол
еро3ф2
ер3с2к
е4р1с
е1ру
е2р1у2п
е1ры1
е1р2ю
е1ря
е3с2а
ес2ба
е1сб2
е1с1г2
е1ск
е2с1ка.
ес1кал
е2с1ке
е2с1ко1в
еск2о
е4с1ку.
еск2у
2есл
ес1лас
ес2лин
ес1ли
ес2ло1в
ес1ло
ес2ло1м
е1слу
е1слы1
е1с4м
е3со
2ес1п2
ес2пек
еспе1
е2с3пол
е2спу
е1ст
ес2т2ан
е2с2т1л
е3сту
ес2чет
есч2
ес1че
е1та
ет1ве
е2т1ви
е1тво
2етеч
е1т2е
е1ти
е1то
ето1с
ет1р
ет2ря
е1ту
е1ты1
е3ть2е
е2ть1
е3ть2ю1
е3ть2я
е1т2ю
е1тя
е1у2
2еуб
еуб3р
еуз2
еук2ло
еф2и3б2
е1ф
еф4и
еф2л
еф1ре
еха2т
е1ха
ех1а1то
ех3вал
е1х2в
ех1ва
ех3ло1п
ех1ло
ех1об
е1хо
ех1опо
ехо1п2
ех1ре
ех1ру
ех1у2ч
2ецв
е1ц
е1чл
е2шл
е1ш
е1э2
ею2г
е1ю
е1я
ея2з
1ж
жа2б1л
жа1б
жа2бр
жа1з
жат1в
2ж1б2
2ж1в
ж1г2
2жг2а
ж2г2и
3ж2гл
ж2гу
2ж1д
ж2да1к
ж1да
ж2да1ч
3ж2дел
ж1де
4ж3деме
жде1м
ж2де1п
ж2ди
4ж2д1л
ж1до3
ж1ду1
4ждь1
3ж2дя
3жев
же3д2
же1к2в
же1кл
ж2е1о2
же3п2
же1с2
же3ск
2жжа
1ж1ж
ж2же
2ж3жев
2ж1з2
жи1о
2ж1и2р1р
жи1р
2ж1к
2ж1л
ж2м
ж3ма
2ж3мо
2ж1н
ж1но1
2ж1об
2ж1о2т1
жо1у3
жоу1с
2ж1п2
жпо1
ж2ру
2ж1с
2ж1ф
2ж1ц
2ж1ч
2жъ1
2жь.
жь1
2жьс
2жьт
1за1
з4а3а2
за1б2
за2в1ри
за2вру
з1а1ву
за1г4
з1адр
за1д
зае2д
за1е
зае2х
за3ж2д
за1ж
за3з2
з1а2к1т
за1к
за3м1не
за1м
за2м1н
3з2ан
за3на
за2н1с2
за1п2
зар2в
за3р2д
зар2ж
зас2
заст2
зат2
за3т1к2
за1у2
зах2
зач2т
за1ч
за3ш2
за1я2
з1б2
2з3ва.
з1ва
з2вав
з3валь1
з2ван
2з3ва1я
з1ве
з2вез
з1ви
з3в2к
з1в2ла
зв1л
з1во
2звол
1з2вон
з1вр
1зву
2з1ву1ю
з1вь1
2з1г
з3г2а
з2г1ли
зг2на
з2г1ну
з1д2в2
з2де1ш
з1де
здо1ж3
з1до
1зе
з2е2б1
зе2ев
зе1е
зе2од
з2ео
2з1ж2
з3з2
1зи
3зи.
3зий.
зи2й1
з1и2н1т
зи2оз
зи2о1но
зи1он
зи1о1п
3зис
зи3т2р
зи1т
зиу3м
зи1у2
3зи1ч
2з1к
зк2о1
зко3п2
з1л
з2ла1щ
з2лоб
з1ло
з2ло1п
з2лор
з2лю1щ
зл2ю
2з1м2
з3м1н
з1н
2зна.
з1на
з2нав
з2на1е
з2на2й1
з2на1к
з2нан
з2нат
з2на1ю
2з3на1я
2з1не
2з3ни
2з1но
2з1ну
2з3ны1
з2о1бе
зо2б2и
1зо1в
зо3в2м
зо2гл
зо1г2
зо1др
1зо1е
зо1з2
1зо3и
1зой.
з2о2й1
1зок.
зо1к
з1о2кс
1зол2
зо1л1г
зо1л1ж
зо3м2
1зом.
2зо2м1н
1зон
2зо1нр
1зо1о2
зо2о3п
зо2ос
зо2па
зо1п
з2опл
з2опр
з1о2р1г
1з2о3ре
зос2
з1ос1н
зо1с1п2
зо2тв2
зо1т
з2о1т2е
з1о2т1к2
з2ото
зот2ре
зот2ри
1зох
зо1ш2
зо2ши
1зо1э
1з2о1ю
з1ра
з2ра1к
зра2с
з2ра1ч
з2рен
з1рес
з2ри1ш
з1ро
зро2с3
з1ру
з2р2ю
з1ря
2з1с
2зт
з1ти
1зу
3зу.
2з1у2бе
зу2б3р
зу1в
2зуве
2зу2г
3зу1е
2з1уз3
2зу1к
3зуме
зу1м
з1у2мо
2зу1п
зу2пр
з1у2р1б
з1у2т2е
зу2час
зу1ча
2з1ц
з1ч
2з1ш
зъе2м
зъ1
1зы1
2зы2г1
зы2з
2зыме
зы1м
2зы2мч
2зы2с1
2зы1щ
1зь2е
зь1
1зь2и1
1зь2ю
3зь2я
1з2ю
1зя
и1а
и2а1б
и2ав
иа1г2
и2агр
и2а1де
иа1д
и2а1ди
иа2зо1в
иа2му
иа1м
и3а1на
иа2нал
иа2н1д2
и2а1о2
и2а1п
и2а1с2к
иа1ста
иа1сто
иат1ро
и3а1ту
и2а1ф
и2а1х
иа2це
иа1ц
2и1б
и2б1р
2ива1ж
и1ва
2и1ве
и2в3з2
и1ви
2и1во
и1в2р
и3в2с2
и1ву
и1в2хо
2и1вы1
иг2д
и1г
и3ге
2игл
и2г1ле
и2г1ли
и2гн
иг1ни3
иг1рен
иг1ро
иг1ру
иг1ры1
и2г1ря
и1дв2
и2де2й1
и1де
и1д2ж
иди1о1м
и1ди
иди1о1т
ид1р
и1дь1
и1е
и2е1вод
ие1во
ие2г
ие2д
ие3де
ие2зу
и3е1ни
и2е1о2
иепи1
ие1п
ие2р
и3ж2д
и1ж
из1в2
из2г1не
и2з1г
1из1д
из2нал
из1н
из1на
и1зо
и1зо2о2
из1р
и1и
ийс2
и2й1
и1к
и3к2а
и3к2а1с2
ик2ва
и2к1ви
и2к1ля
и3к2о
ик1ро
ик1ск
и2кс
ик2с1т
и3к2у
и1л
и2л1а2ц
ило1с1к
и1ло
и2л1п2
и2л1у2п
и2ль1
и2льт2
2има
и1м
и2ме1но
и2ме1ну
2имень1
и3ми
имо3и2
им3п2л
и2м1п
и2м1р
и2мч
им2ча
и2н1д2
1ин1ж
